District of Columbia statutes.
47-207

Items included in annual estimates — Assignment of certain market employees.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia each year in the annual estimates shall report to Congress the assignment of the market masters, assistant market masters, watchmen, and laborers to the various markets and offices.

July 11, 1919, 41 Stat. 70, ch. 7, § 1
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

History

1981 Ed., § 47-207.
1973 Ed., § 47-205.

Prior Codifications